Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 6. Duties and Powers of Conservator

§ 3-3-601.
General duties of conservator.

The conservator of the estate shall protect and preserve it, invest it prudently, account for it as provided in the Wyoming statutes, expend it for the benefit of the ward and perform all other duties required by law. At the termination of the conservatorship, the conservator shall deliver the assets of the ward to the person entitled to receive them.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Quoted in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Dec. 29, 2015).

Applied

in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2014 WY 87,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 96

, 2014 WL 3058279 (Jul 8, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of inter vivos gift by ward to guardian or conservator, 70 ALR4th 499.

§ 3-3-602.
Inventory of ward's property.

Within ninety (90) days after the date of his appointment, or, within additional time allowed by the court, a conservator shall file in the court a verified inventory of all of the property of the ward which has come into his possession or of which he has knowledge. When any property of the ward not listed in the inventory comes into the possession or to the knowledge of the conservator, he shall include the after discovered property in his next accounting.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-603.
Disposition of will by conservator.

When the conservator receives an instrument purporting to be the will of the ward he shall immediately deliver it to the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-604.
Court order to preserve testamentary intent of ward.

The court may read the instrument purporting to be the will of the ward which the conservator delivered to the court. With or without notice as it may determine, the court may enter any orders it deems advisable for the proper administration of the conservatorship in light of the expressed testamentary intent of the ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-605.
Court to file sealed copy and deliver will to conservator.

A copy of an instrument purporting to be the will of a ward coming into the possession of the court under W.S.

3-3-603

, shall be made, sealed and deposited in the file of the conservatorship. The original copy of the will shall be sealed and returned to the conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-606.
Powers of conservator without order of court.

Without prior order of the court the conservator may:

Collect, receive, receipt for any principal or income;

Enforce, defend against or prosecute any claim by or against the ward or the conservator;

Sue on and defend claims in favor of or against the ward or the conservator;

Sell and transfer personal property of a perishable nature and personal property for which there is a regularly established market;

Vote at corporate meetings in person or by proxy;

Receive additional property from any source;

Continue to hold any investment or other property originally received by him, and any increase thereof, pending the timely filing of the first annual report;

Apply the principal, income and profits of the estate of the ward, to the extent necessary, for the comfortable and suitable maintenance, education, support and care of the ward in an amount proportionate to the value of his estate or his condition in life taking into account any parental duty of support as provided in W.S.

3-3-607

;

Invest the funds belonging to the ward;

Pay the funds to or for the benefit of the ward in any of the following ways:

Directly to the ward;

Directly to the provider for the maintenance, support, education and care of the ward;

To the legal guardian of the person of the ward; or

To anyone who at the time has the custody and care of the person of the ward.

Appear for and represent the ward in all legal proceedings, unless another person is appointed for that purpose, and prosecute or defend actions, claims or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of estate assets and of the conservator in the performance of his duties;

Request the court to modify the conservator’s range of duties if the changed circumstances of the ward require such modifications.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conveyance of Property Requires Court Approval. —

Where a grantor's conservators filed suit to set aside a previous conveyance of property by the grantor to himself and a grantee at joint tenants and where they subsequently executed a deed conveying the grantor's remaining interest in the property to himself as a tenant in common in an effort to destroy the joint tenancy, the conveyance by the conservators was not valid because an exchange or sale of real estate was something that could not be done without court approval. While the conservators applied for court approval after the fact, the grantor died before court approval was given; the grantor's death rendered approval impossible because, upon the grantor's death, all title to the property vested in the grantee as the joint tenant.
Krafczik v. Morris, 2009 WY 53, 206 P.3d 372,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2014 WY 87,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 96

, 2014 WL 3058279 (Jul 8, 2014).

§ 3-3-607.
Powers of conservator subject to the approval of the court.

Upon order of the court after hearing and notice as prescribed by the court the conservator may:

Apply any portion of the income or of the estate of the ward for the support of any person for whose support the ward is legally liable;

Compromise or settle any claim by or against the ward or the conservator, and adjust, arbitrate or compromise claims in favor of or against the ward or conservator;

Apply the income and profits of the minor ward for his maintenance, care, support and education if the court finds that the parent of the minor ward should be relieved of the obligation of parental support;

Do any other thing that the court determines to be in the best interest of the ward and his estate;

Sell, mortgage, exchange, pledge or lease real and personal property belonging to the ward, including the homestead and exempt personal property when it appears to be in the best interest of the ward, in the same manner and by the same procedure provided by title 2, Wyoming statutes for the sale, mortgage, exchange, pledge and lease by personal representatives in administration of estates of decedents;

Create a written revocable inter vivos trust, with a corporate trustee whose principal place of business is in Wyoming and which has trust powers under or in accordance with the laws of Wyoming, and transfer to the trust any part or all of the assets belonging to the ward. The trust shall provide by its terms that it may be revoked at any time by the court in which event the trustee shall deliver all of the trust assets then in its possession in accordance with the order of the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effect of Conveyance of Property Without Court Approval. —

Where a grantor's conservators filed suit to set aside a previous conveyance of property by the grantor to himself and a grantee at joint tenants and where they subsequently executed a deed conveying the grantor's remaining interest in the property to himself as a tenant in common in an effort to destroy the joint tenancy, the conveyance by the conservators was not valid because an exchange or sale of real estate was something that could not be done without court approval. While the conservators applied for court approval after the fact, the grantor died before court approval was given; the grantor's death rendered approval impossible because, upon the grantor's death, all title to the property vested in the grantee as the joint tenant.
Krafczik v. Morris, 2009 WY 53, 206 P.3d 372,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2009).

Applied

in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2014 WY 87,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 96

, 2014 WL 3058279 (Jul 8, 2014).

§ 3-3-608.
Appointment of attorney in compromise of personal injury settlements.

Notwithstanding the provisions of W.S. 3-3-607(a)(ii), prior to authorizing a compromise of a claim for damages on account of personal injuries to the ward, the court may order an independent investigation by an attorney other than the attorney for the conservator. The cost of the investigation, including a reasonable attorney fee, shall be taxed as part of the cost of the conservatorship.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-609.
Powers of conservators; same as fiduciaries.

Except as expressly modified in title 3, Wyoming statutes, a conservator has the powers relating to all fiduciaries as provided in title 2, Wyoming statutes.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-3-610.
Breach of contracts.

A conservator may breach contracts of the ward entered into by the ward prior to the appointment of the conservator after notice and hearing and order of the court for good cause. The conservator shall incur the same liability of the ward’s estate for the breach as the ward would have incurred for the breach had he been competent.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-611.
Tort liability of conservator.

The fact that a person is a conservator or a guardian shall not in itself make him personally liable for damages for the acts of his ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.